Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2510.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 6326(b), (c), (d) and (e) and 6327 of Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 6326. Release or delivery to court.* * *(b) Detention in police lockup generally prohibited.--[Unless a child taken into custody is alleged to have committed a crime or summary offense or to be in violation of conditions of probation or other supervision following an adjudication of delinquency, the] Except as provided in subsection (c), no child may [not] be detained in a municipal police lockup or cell or otherwise held [securely] within a law enforcement facility or 123456789101112131415161718 structure which houses an adult lockup. [A child shall be deemed to be held securely only when physically detained or confined in a locked room or cell or when secured to a cuffing rail or other stationary object within the facility.](c) Detention in police lockup under certain circumstances.--A child alleged to have committed a crime or summary offense or to be in violation of conditions of probation or other supervision following an adjudication of delinquency may be held [securely] in a municipal police lockup or other facility which houses an adult lockup only under the following conditions:(1) the [secure] holding shall only be for the purpose of identification, investigation, processing, releasing or transferring the child to a parent, guardian, other custodian, or juvenile court or county children and youth official, or to a shelter care or juvenile detention center;(2) the [secure] holding shall be limited to the minimum time necessary to complete the procedures listed in paragraph (1), but in no case may such holding exceed six hours; and(3) if so held, a child must be separated by sight and sound from incarcerated adult offenders and must be under the continuous visual supervision of law enforcement officials or facility staff.[(d) Conditions of detention.--Notwithstanding other provisions of law, a child held in nonsecure custody in a building or facility which houses an adult lockup may be so held only under the following conditions:(1) the area where the child is held is an unlocked multipurpose area which is not designated or used as a secure detention area or is not part of a secure detention area; or, 20260HB2510PN3397 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 if the area is a secure booking or similar area, it is used only for processing purposes;(2) the child is not physically secured to a cuffing rail or other stationary object during the period of custody in the facility;(3) the area is limited to providing nonsecure custody only long enough for the purposes of identification, investigation, processing or release to parents or for arranging transfer to another agency or appropriate facility; and(4) the child must be under continuous visual supervision by a law enforcement officer or other facility staff during the period of nonsecure custody.](e) Reports regarding children held in custody.--Law enforcement agencies shall provide information and reports regarding children held [in secure and nonsecure custody] under [subsections] subsection (c) [and (d)] as requested by the Pennsylvania Commission on Crime and Delinquency.* * *§ 6327. Place of detention.(a) General rule.--A child alleged to be delinquent [may be detained only in:], or who has been charged with an act under paragraph (2)(i), (ii) or (iii) of the definition of "delinquent act" in section 6302 (relating to definitions) may be detained subject to preadjudicatory or pretrial detention only if, following a hearing and the presentation of competent evidence, a judge determines that there is no lesser restrictive alternative that is consistent with the purposes of this act. Except as provided in subsection (a.2), if there is no lesser restrictive alternative, a child may only be detained in:20260HB2510PN3397 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) A licensed foster home or a home approved by the court.(2) A facility operated by a licensed child welfare agency or one approved by the court.(3) A detention home, camp, center or other facility for delinquent children which is under the direction or supervision of the court or other public authority or private agency, and is approved by the Department of [Public Welfare] Human Services.(4) Any other suitable place or facility, designated or operated by the court and approved by the Department of [Public Welfare] Human Services.Under no circumstances shall a child be detained in any facility [with adults, or] where the child is apt to be abused by other children.(a.1) Right to bail.--(1) A child who has been charged with an act specified under paragraph (2)(i), (ii) or (iii) of the definition of "delinquent act" in section 6302 for whom a judge determines, consistent with subsection (a), that pretrial detention is the least restrictive alternative, shall be granted an immediate bail hearing consistent with the provisions of Chapter 57 (relating to bonds and recognizances) and the general rules of criminal procedure.(2) Following a hearing consistent with paragraph (1), any imposition of monetary conditions shall be justified in writing or on the record by the bail authority who shall:(i) In terms of the release criteria enumerated in the rules of criminal procedure, state the reasons why conditions other than release on recognizance has been 20260HB2510PN3397 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 set.(ii) State the facts that support a determination that the child has the ability to pay the monetary condition ordered.(3) Any child for whom a monetary condition of bail has been imposed shall be granted an immediate and reasonable opportunity to post bail.(a.2) Pretrial detention.--A child who has been charged with an act specified under paragraph (2)(i), (ii) or (iii) of the definition of "delinquent act" in section 6302 for whom a judge determines, consistent with subsection (a), that pretrial detention is the least restrictive alternative and who has not been released on bail shall not be incarcerated in a jail or other facility for the detention of adult offenders unless a judge finds by clear and convincing evidence, following a hearing and the presentation of competent evidence, that the child presents a danger to the physical health or safety of other children in detention, which risk cannot be safely mitigated in the detention setting.(b) Report by correctional officer of receipt of child.--The official in charge of a jail or other facility for the detention of adult offenders or persons charged with crime shall inform the court immediately if a person who is or appears to be under the age of 18 years is received at the facility and shall bring him before the court upon request or deliver him to a detention or shelter care facility designated by the court.(c) Detention in jail prohibited.--It is unlawful for any person in charge of or employed by a jail knowingly to receive for detention or to detain in the jail any person whom he has or should have reason to believe is a child unless, in a criminal 20260HB2510PN3397 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 proceeding, the child has been [charged with or has been found guilty] convicted of an act set forth in paragraph (2)(i), (ii), (iii) or (v) of the definition of "delinquent act" in section 6302 [(relating to definitions)] and a sentence of total confinement has been imposed by the court.[(c.1) Detention of child.--(1) A child who is subject to criminal proceedings having been charged with an act set forth under paragraph (2)(i), (ii) or (iii) of the definition of "delinquent act" in section 6302, who has not been released on bail and who may seek or is seeking transfer to juvenile proceedings under section 6322 (relating to transfer from criminal proceedings) may be detained in a secure detention facility approved by the Department of Public Welfare for the detention of alleged and adjudicated delinquent children if the attorney for the Commonwealth has consented to and the court has ordered the detention.(2) Secure detention ordered under this subsection shall not affect a child's eligibility for or ability to post bail.(3) For a child held in secure detention under this subsection, the court shall order the immediate transfer of the child to the county jail if any of the following apply:(i) The court determines that the child is no longer seeking transfer under section 6322.(ii) The court denies the motion filed under section 6322.(iii) The child attains 18 years of age. This subparagraph does not apply if:(A) the court has granted the motion filed under section 6322; or20260HB2510PN3397 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (B) the child is otherwise under order of commitment to the secure detention facility pursuant to the jurisdiction of the court in a delinquency matter.(d) Transfer of child subject to criminal proceedings.--If a case is transferred for criminal prosecution the child may be transferred to the appropriate officer or detention facility in accordance with the law governing the detention of persons charged with crime. The court in making the transfer may order continued detention as a juvenile pending trial if the child is unable to provide bail.](e) Detention of dependent child.--A child alleged to be dependent may be detained or placed only in a Department of [Public Welfare] Human Services approved shelter care facility as stated in subsection (a)(1), (2) and (4), and shall not be detained in a jail or other facility intended or used for the detention of adults charged with criminal offenses, but may be detained in the same shelter care facilities with alleged or adjudicated delinquent children.(f) Development of approved shelter care programs.--The Department of [Public Welfare] Human Services shall develop or assist in the development in each county of this Commonwealth approved programs for the provision of shelter care for children needing these services who have been taken into custody under section 6324 (relating to taking into custody) and for children referred to or under the jurisdiction of the court.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2510PN3397 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627